Alaska, session 34, SB191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 05 to read: 06 APPROVAL OF THE TRANSFER OF REAL PROPERTY TO THE CITY OF 07 WHITTIER. (a) The Alaska Railroad Corporation is authorized to convey the corporation's 08 interest in the surface estate of approximately 84.8 acres of rail land located within five areas 09 of interest within the City of Whittier to the City of Whittier for fair market value, subject to 10 valid existing rights. The five areas of interest are generally described as follows: 11 (1) approximately 0.8 acres located within Section 23 of Township 8 North, 12 Range 4 East, Seward Meridian that consists of a portion of Parcel B of U.S. Survey No. 13 2559, according to the plat of survey officially filed December 14, 1994, together with a 14 portion of Lot 8 of U.S. Survey 9008, according to the plat of survey officially filed 01 October 12, 1995; 02 (2) approximately 36 acres located within Section 23 of Township 8 North, 03 Range 4 East, Seward Meridian that consists of a portion of Lot 8 of U.S. Survey No. 9008, 04 according to the plat of survey officially filed October 12, 1995, together with a portion of 05 Parcel A of U.S. Survey No. 2559 according to the plat of survey officially filed 06 December 14, 1994, in the land records of the federal Bureau of Land Management, 07 Anchorage Field Office; 08 (3) approximately 10.2 acres located within Sections 13, 14, 23, and 24 of 09 Township 8 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian that consists of Parcels I, J, and H, 10 together with Lot 11 and a portion of Lot 8 of U.S. Survey No. 9008, according to the plat of 11 survey officially filed October 12, 1995, in the land records of the federal Bureau of Land 12 Management, Anchorage Field Office; 13 (4) approximately 22.3 acres located within Sections 14, 15, 22, and 23 of 14 Township 8 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian that consists of Lot 2, Lot 4, and a portion 15 of Lot 8 of U.S. Survey No. 9008, according to the plat of survey officially filed October 12, 16 1995, in the land records of the federal Bureau of Land Management, Anchorage Field Office; 17 (5) approximately 15.5 acres located within Section 15 of Township 8 North, 18 Range 4 East, Seward Meridian that consists of a portion of Lot 1, U.S. Survey No. 9008, 19 according to the plat of survey officially filed October 12, 1995, in the land records of the 20 federal Bureau of Land Management, Anchorage Field Office. 21 (b) The legislature recognizes that the real property in the areas of interest described 22 in (a) of this section includes portions of existing lots, which are not currently discrete and 23 separate parcels, and that surveying and platting actions necessary to convey the real property 24 in the areas of interest described in (a) of this section will change the legal description of the 25 real property. It is the intent of the legislature that the land transfer approved in this Act 26 include any land described by a reasonable modification to the legal description of the real 27 property described in (a) of this section to the extent that the transfer of that land is approved 28 by the board of directors of the Alaska Railroad Corporation under AS 42.40. The Alaska 29 Railroad Corporation and the City of Whittier shall make and execute an agreement to 30 conduct any necessary surveying and platting actions. 31 (c) In consideration for the conveyance authorized in (a) of this section, the Alaska 01 Railroad Corporation may accept cash equivalent to the fair market value of the land being 02 conveyed. 03 (d) This section constitutes legislative approval under AS 42.40.285(1) for the Alaska 04 Railroad Corporation to convey its entire interest in the land described in (a) of this section. 05 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.